dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
быти/Eb
быти/Eb
лјуты/Ec
марец/Ed
присежны/Ee
срєднје/Ef
учены/Ee
вугол/Eg
жаден/Eh
чијлибо/Ei
чтолибо/Ej
хујесос/Ek
какылибо/El
кторылибо/El
двојче/Em
прєнебрєгти/En
одидти/Eo
птаче/Em
лож/Ep
дєвче/Em
четверо/Eq
петеро/Eq
шестеро/Eq
седмеро/Eq
осмеро/Eq
деветеро/Eq
десетеро/Eq
четверка/Er
петка/Er
шестка/Er
седмка/Er
осмка/Er
деветка/Er
десетка/Er
злоты/Ec
слушалкы/Es
никарагуа/Et
подданы/Ee
нарєчены/Ee
свинец/Ed
знајемы/Ee
возрастлы/Ee
дорастлы/Ee
ногавкы/Es
кол/Eg
лјубы/Ee
медвєдже/Em
осмерка/Er
жмуркы/Es
членистоногы/Ee
седмерка/Er
шестерка/Er
петерка/Er
внуче/Em
редовы/Ee
меккотєлы/Ee
помфриткы/Es
јединка/Er
